Massachusetts, session 194th, H903.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 132 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 51 the following 3 sections:- 
Section 52. For the purposes of Sections 52 to 54, inclusive, the following words shall 
have the following meanings: 
“Buffer area”, an area on state-owned land immediately adjacent to an old growth forest 
that is of sufficient size and configuration, as determined by the secretary, for each old growth 
forest to protect the old growth forest from human activity and alteration and mitigate the effects 
of natural disturbances including, but not limited to wind, storms, fire, insect infestation, invasive 
species and disease. 

of 6 10  “Old growth forest”, an area of contiguous forest on state-owned land that: 
(1) shows no evidence of significant human disturbance that originated on the site; 
(2) has a significant component of older trees that are greater than 50 percent of the 
maximum longevity for the particular species; 
(3) is at least 5 acres in size; and 
(4) has either: (i) the capacity for self-perpetuation; or (ii) the characteristics of a forest 
which are indicative of an old growth forest and which otherwise meets the criteria established 
by regulations of the secretary. Modification of this definition may be made by regulation to 
incorporate future scientific advances in the understanding of old growth forests. 
“Old growth forest reserve”, forest area comprised of old growth forest and buffer area. 
“Recommending party”, the commissioner of conservation and recreation or the 
commissioner of fish and game. 
“Secretary”, the secretary of energy and environmental affairs. 
“State-owned land”, forest land owned in fee by the commonwealth under the custody 
and control of the department of conservation and recreation or the department of fish and game. 
“Existing Use”, any commercial or recreational project, facility, roadway, industrial or 
utility corridor, or the repair or future maintenance therein within its existing parameters: 
(1) existing as of the date of enactment of this act, or 

of 6 28  (2) approved under the Massachusetts Environmental Policy Act (“MEPA”) and where 
any required approvals and permits have been issued by state and federal agencies, as of the date 
of such enactment; provided such approvals or permits are valid and which if challenged in a 
timely judicial proceeding has been upheld by a final court order. 
Section 53. (a) The secretary shall conduct an inventory of the forests on state-owned 
land to determine the extent and condition of old growth forest stands based on existing 
inventory data and assessments by the departments of conservation and recreation and the 
department of fish and game. The secretary shall direct such departments to conduct additional 
assessments and inventories as the secretary deems necessary. The preliminary identification of 
old growth forest stands should also include an estimate of necessary buffer areas, including an 
explanation of the rationale for the estimated size and shape of such buffer areas. 
(b) The secretary may designate a reserve comprised of old growth forest, together with 
buffer areas, after the forest area has been presented by a recommending party to the secretary in 
accordance with regulations adopted by the secretary. In approving, rejecting or modifying a 
designation, the secretary shall consider: 
(1) whether the area recommended is consistent with the definitions of old growth forest 
and buffer area; 
(2) whether such designation is consistent with the ecological, historical, educational, 
cultural, economic, water supply, recreational and other public values of the area; and 
(3) the role of the proposed area within a statewide old growth forest reserve system. 

of 6 48  (c) If the recommended area appears to meet the definition of an old growth forest as set 
forth under this section and other criteria established by the secretary pursuant to this section, the 
secretary may designate it as an old-growth forest reserve after: (i) holding a public hearing 
within 180 days of the presentation to the secretary, to be held in the region where the the 
proposed old growth reserve is located; and (ii) consulting with elected officials of each town 
where the proposed old-growth reserve is located. 
Section 54. (a) The secretary shall develop, in consultation with the recommending party 
and, if different, the administering agency, plans for the management and protection of old 
growth forest reserves. The secretary shall authorize the continuation of fishing and hunting in 
designated old growth forest reserves, unless prohibited by regulation. Notwithstanding the 
previous sentence, the administering agency, after such designation, may restrict or prohibit any 
activity of fishing and hunting if the agency determines the activity is not suitable for the 
protection and management of the old growth forest reserve. The secretary may also authorize 
the continuation of any existing use within the old growth forest reserve, provided such use does 
not significantly contribute to erosion or other harmful impacts on the forest resources. Upon a 
determination of the adequacy of a recommendation, the secretary shall establish a moratorium 
on any activity that is incompatible with the establishment of an old growth forest reserve at such 
location pending a final determination on designating such area an old growth forest reserve. 
(b) The following uses and activities shall be prohibited within the boundaries of old 
growth forest reserves that have been designated by the secretary in accordance with the 
provisions under of section 53: (i) new commercial, industrial, roadway or utility development; 
(ii) new or expanded recreational facilities and uses involving physical impacts to vegetation or 
soils; and (iii) active timber management practices. Removal or alteration of vegetation and soils, 

of 6 71 and collecting or harvesting of plants shall be prohibited except in connection with a scientific 
investigation or restoration program approved by the secretary. The prohibitions in this 
paragraph shall not apply to emergency personnel in the event of a medical or public safety 
emergency in an old growth forest reserve. The secretary may approve other exceptions to the 
prohibitions by issuing a written declaration of emergency in the event of a major accidental, 
human-induced disturbance, including without limitations in the event of the introduction of 
exotic invasive plants, disease or insects threatens the integrity of an old growth reserve; a public 
health, or public safety emergency and to protect the health and well-being of the surrounding 
public and private forests. The secretary shall restrict management of invasive plants, diseases or 
insects to activities that are essential to the maintenance of the natural characteristics of the old 
growth forest reserves, and shall condition such activities to minimize interference with the 
development and maintenance of natural old growth forest conditions without harming the health 
and well-being of the surrounding public and private forests. 
(c) The secretary shall adopt regulations for the establishment and management of old 
growth forest reserves. 
(d) Any person who violates this section or any regulation promulgated pursuant to this 
section shall be punished by a fine of not more than $5,000 or by imprisonment in a house of 
correction for not more than 1 year or both such fine and imprisonment. Each day such violation 
occurs or continues shall be considered a separate violation. 
(e) The superior court shall have jurisdiction to enjoin violations of, or to grant such 
additional relief as it deems necessary or appropriate to secure compliance with this section upon 
petition of the secretary or the attorney general. 

of 6 93  SECTION 2. The secretary of energy and environmental affairs shall establish a research 
and education program to monitor the status of forests within old growth forest reserves and to 
promote understanding of old growth forest reserves. 
SECTION 3. The secretary of energy and environmental affairs shall file a report with 
the joint committee on environment, natural resources and agriculture within 1 year after the 
effective date of this act identifying the results of the inventory, the regulations developed, and 
the progress made in designating old growth forest reserves and the preparation of management 
100 plans for old growth forest reserves pursuant to this act.